Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Judgments by Confession

Cross references. —

As to confession of judgment generally, see chapter 10 of this title.

As to confession of judgment in municipal courts of cities of the first class, see §

5-6-208

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 228 to 264.

Successive judgments by confession on cognovit note or similar instrument, 80 ALR2d 1380.

Agent's authority to execute warrant of attorney to confess judgment against principal, 92 ALR2d 952.

Enforceability of warrant of attorney to confess judgment against assignee, guarantor or other party obligating himself for performance of primary contract, 5 ALR3d 426.

Constitutionality, construction, application and effect of statute invalidating powers of attorney to confess judgment or contract giving such powers, 40 ALR3d 1158.

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 146 to 157.

§ 1-16-201.
Right to confess judgment.

A person indebted or
against whom a cause of action exists, may personally appear in a
court of competent jurisdiction and with the assent of the creditor
or person having such cause of action, confess judgment, whereupon
judgment shall be entered accordingly.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 328; R.S. 1887, § 2668; R.S. 1899, § 3762; C.S. 1910, § 4617; C.S. 1920, § 5888; R.S. 1931, § 89-2502; C.S. 1945, § 3-3512; W.S. 1957, § 1-309; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-201

.

Intention of legislature

is to insure protection of the debtor when judgment is of the consent type. Eggeman v. Western Nat'l Bank, 596 P.2d 318,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1979).

Judgment exceeded matters confessed. —

In an action to establish a permanent easement, judgment entered on a partial confession of judgment in favor of dominant estate owners was void; the judgment went beyond the matters admitted in the servient estate owner's confession of judgment. Huish v. Sulenta, 2002 WY 139, 54 P.3d 748,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Grand Island & N.W.R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

, 34 L.R.A. 835 (1896).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of confession or other statement made by defendant as affected by delay in arraignment — modern state cases, 28 ALR4th 1121.

§ 1-16-202.
Warrant of attorney to be produced.

An attorney who confesses
judgment in any case, at the time of making the confession shall produce
the warrant of attorney for making the same to the court. The original
or a copy of the warrant shall be filed with the clerk of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 331; R.S. 1887, § 2671; R.S. 1899, § 3765; C.S. 1910, § 4620; C.S. 1920, § 5891; R.S. 1931, § 89-2505; C.S. 1945, § 3-3515; W.S. 1957, § 1-312; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-202

.

Intention of legislature

is to insure protection of the debtor when judgment is of the consent type. Eggeman v. Western Nat'l Bank, 596 P.2d 318,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1979).

Cognovit judgment not violative of due process rights. —

A cognovit judgment obtained against a lessee-store owner pursuant to a lease provision which authorized any attorney to appear for and confess judgment against lessee in case of default is not, per se, violative of lessee's due process rights under the fourteenth amendment of the United States constitution and article 1, §§ 6 and 8 of the state constitution. Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 618 P.2d 547,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1980).

Confession under warrant of attorney not contrary to public
policy. —

A confession of judgment under a warrant of attorney contained in a promissory note is not contrary to public policy. Westring v. Cheyenne Nat'l Bank, 393 P.2d 119,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1964).

And is as potent as personal confession. —

A confession of judgment under a warrant of attorney is as potent in its operation as a judgment upon personal confession authorizing a debtor, with the consent of the creditor, to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to confess judgment. Westring v. Cheyenne Nat'l Bank, 393 P.2d 119,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Grand Island & N.W.R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

, 34 L.R.A. 835 (1896).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What law governs validity of warrant or power of attorney to confess judgment, 19 ALR2d 544.

Necessity, in order to enter judgment by confession on instrument containing warrant of attorney, that original note or other instrument and original warrant be produced or filed, 68 ALR2d 1156.

Requirements as to signing, sealing and attestation in warrants of attorney to confess judgment, 3 ALR3d 1147.

§ 1-16-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988,
ch. 37, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 332, related to the execution of the warrant of attorney by a person in custody.